Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1683.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be


codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:


This act shall be known and may be cited as the “Local


Telecommunications Control and Siting Act of 2026”.


SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 36-513 of Title 11, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. As used in this section:





Req. No. 3503 Page 1


1. “Applicant” means any person or entity that seeks to


construct, install, modify, or collocate a telecommunications tower


or related facility; and


2. “Telecommunications tower” means any structure designed or


intended to support antennas, dishes, or other transmitting or


receiving equipment for wireless communications services, together


with any accessory equipment or structures.


B. Except as otherwise provided by federal law, all regulatory,


zoning, and permitting authority concerning the siting,


construction, and modification of telecommunications towers and


related facilities shall remain under the jurisdiction of the


municipality having zoning power over the affected area.


C. Nothing in this act shall:


1. Preempt or diminish a municipality’s power to establish


zoning districts, design standards, height restrictions, or setback


requirements for telecommunications towers;


2. Prohibit municipalities from imposing reasonable application


or review fees sufficient to recover administrative costs; or


3. Prevent enforcement of local building codes, land use


ordinances, or public safety standards regarding tower siting.


D. Municipalities shall review applications consistent with


time frames and procedural obligations established by the Federal


Communications Commission, including those set forth in its “shot


clock” regulations.

Req. No. 3503 Page 2


E. No agency, board, or commission of this state shall adopt or


enforce a rule, policy, or regulation that supersedes or preempts


the zoning, permitting, or siting authority of municipal governments


over telecommunications towers, except to the extent required by


federal law.


SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 863.49 of Title 19, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. As used in this section:


1. “Applicant” means any person or entity that seeks to


construct, install, modify, or collocate a telecommunications tower


or related facility; and


2. “Telecommunications tower” means any structure designed or


intended to support antennas, dishes, or other transmitting or


receiving equipment for wireless communications services, together


with any accessory equipment or structures.


B. Except as otherwise provided by federal law, all regulatory,


zoning, and permitting authority concerning the siting,


construction, and modification of telecommunications towers and


related facilities shall remain under the jurisdiction of the county


having zoning power over the affected area.


C. Nothing in this act shall:





Req. No. 3503 Page 3


1. Preempt or diminish a county’s power to establish zoning


districts, design standards, height restriction, or setback


requirements for telecommunications towers;


2. Prohibit counties from imposing reasonable application or


review fees sufficient to recover administrative costs; or


3. Prevent enforcement of local building codes, land use


ordinances, or public safety standards regarding tower siting.


D. Counties shall review applications consistent with time


frames and procedural obligations established by the Federal


Communications Commission, including those set forth in its “shot


clock” regulations.


E. No agency, board, or commission of this state shall adopt or


enforce a rule, policy, or regulation that supersedes or preempts


the zoning, permitting, or siting authority of county governments


over telecommunications towers, except to the extent required by


federal law.


SECTION 4. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-3503 YG 1/14/2026 9:59:25 AM











Req. No. 3503 Page 4